Colorado, session 2026A, SB169.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-307, repeal (3)(d)
as follows:
2-2-307. Compensation of members - reimbursement of expenses
- definitions - repeal.
(3) (d) Notwithstanding this section or any other provision of law,
a member of the general assembly who is appointed to a statutorily created
interim committee is not entitled during the 2025 interim to per diem and
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

travel expenses for attendance at a meeting of the interim committee during
the 2025 interim, except for attendance at a meeting of the wildfire matters
review committee created pursuant to section 2-3-1602, the water resources
and agriculture review committee created pursuant to section 37-98-102,
and the transportation legislation review committee created pursuant to
section 43-2-145.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-2103, amend
(1)(b)(VI) as follows:
2-2-2103. Accountability, accreditation, student performance,
and resource inequity task force - duties - report.
(1) (b) To support the considerations of the task force set forth in
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the task force may review:
(VI) The interim and final reports from the secondary,
postsecondary, and work-based learning integration task force created in
part 2 of article 35.3 of title 22 PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL IN 2024;
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-4.5-103, amend (b)
and (c) as follows:
6-4.5-103. Filing requirement.
(b) A person that files a form under subsection (2)(a) (a)(1) of this
section shall include with the filing a complete electronic copy of the
additional documentary material.
(c) On request of the attorney general, a person that filed a form
under subsection (2)(a) (a)(2) of this section shall provide a complete
electronic copy of the additional documentary material to the attorney
general not later than seven days after receipt of the request.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-23-101, amend the
introductory portion as follows:
6-23-101. Definitions.
As used in this section ARTICLE 23:
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-169

SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-3.7-205, amend (1)
as follows:
8-3.7-205. Statewide welcome, reception, and integration cash
fund - appropriation.
(1) The statewide welcome, reception, and integration cash fund is
created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money transferred to the
fund pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and any other money that the
general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. APPROPRIATED OR
TRANSFERRED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-83-601, repeal (4.5)
as follows:
8-83-601. Definitions.
As used in this part 6:
(4.5) "Externship program" means the statewide teacher externship
program created in section 8-83-602.5.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 11-35-101, amend (1)
as follows:
11-35-101. Alternatives to surety bonds permitted -
requirements - definition - rules.
(1) The requirement of a surety bond as a condition to licensure or
authority to conduct business or perform duties in this state provided in
sections 5-16-124 (1), 6-16-104.6, 12-10-717, 23-64-121 (1), 33-4-101 (1),
33-12-104 (1), 35-55-104 (1), 37-91-107 (2) and (3), 38-29-119 (2),
39-21-105, 39-27-104 (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d), (2)(e), (2.1)(a), (2.1)(b),
(2.1)(c), and (2.5)(b), 39-28-105 (1), 42-6-115 (3), 42-7-301 (6), 44-20-112,
44-20-113, 44-20-114, 44-20-412, and 44-20-413 may be satisfied by a
savings account or deposit in or a certificate of deposit issued by a state or
national bank doing business in this state or by a savings account or deposit
in or a certificate of deposit issued by a state or federal savings and loan
association doing business in this state. The savings account, deposit, or
certificate of deposit must be in the amount specified by statute, if any, and
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-169

must be assigned to the appropriate state agency for the use of the people
of the state of Colorado. The aggregate liability of the bank or savings and
loan association must in no event exceed the amount of the deposit. For the
purposes of the sections referred to in this section, "bond" includes the
savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit authorized by this section.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 11-35-101.5, amend
(1) as follows:
11-35-101.5. Irrevocable letter of credit permitted -
requirements.
(1) Where there is the requirement of either an irrevocable letter of
credit or a bond as a condition to licensure in sections 35-36-216 and
35-36-304 or where an irrevocable letter of credit is permitted as an
alternative to a surety bond, evidence of a savings account, deposit, or
certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, as a
condition to licensure or authority to conduct business or perform duties in
this state, provided in sections 33-4-101 (1), 33-12-104 (1), 35-36-216
(1)(a), 35-36-303 (5), 35-36-304 (1)(a), 37-91-107 (2), and 39-27-104
(2.1)(c), AND 37-91-107 (2), the requirement shall be satisfied by an
irrevocable letter of credit issued by a state or national bank or a state or
federal savings and loan association doing business in this state. The
requirement shall also be satisfied by an irrevocable letter of credit issued
by the bank or banks for cooperatives that are organized pursuant to federal
statutes and that serve the region in which the state of Colorado is located.
Such letter of credit shall be in an amount specified by statute, if any, and
shall name the appropriate state agency as beneficiary, in favor of the
people of the state of Colorado.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 11-103-203, amend (6)
as follows:
11-103-203. Liability of shareholders.
(6) If such shareholder thereafter deposits with the banking board
an amount of money equal to double the amount of the par value of the
stakeholder's SHAREHOLDER'S shares, to be held by the banking board as
security for the shareholder's liability under this section, then the banking
board shall execute and file with such county clerk and recorder a release
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-169

of such lien and, upon completing the liquidation of such bank, shall return
to such shareholder any excess of such deposit, if such shareholder's
ultimate liability shall prove to be less than the amount so deposited with
the banking board; and in all cases where the liability of the shareholder has
been satisfied, either as the result of litigation or otherwise, such liens so
filed shall be released by the banking board. The expense of filing and
recording such liens and releases of the liens shall be paid out of any assets
of the bank in the possession of the banking board.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 11-103-403, amend
(3) as follows:
11-103-403. Stockholders' meetings - voting trusts - preemptive
right - transfer of stock - rules.
(3) A stockholder authorized to vote may, by means of a proxy
executed in writing, appoint a representative to cast the shareholder's
STOCKHOLDER'S vote. The banking board may promulgate rules governing
proxies and the solicitation thereof.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-165-108, amend
(3) as follows:
12-165-108. Radon measurement and radon mitigation licenses
- qualifications - fees - renewal - rules.
(3) Licenses issued pursuant to this article 165 are subject to the
provisions in section 12-20-102 (1) and (2) 12-20-202 (1) AND (2)
concerning renewal, expiration, reinstatement, and delinquency fees. An
individual whose license expires and who continues to do business as a
radon measurement professional or radon mitigation professional is subject
to the penalties provided in this article 165 and section 12-20-202 (1).
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-5.5-104, amend
(4.5)(e) as follows:
13-5.5-104. State commission on judicial performance - district
commissions on judicial performance - established - membership -
terms - immunity - conflicts - repeal.
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-169

(4.5) (e) This subsection (4.5) is repealed, effective July 1, 2028
2030.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 17-1-102, amend
(7.6)(b)(II) as follows:
17-1-102. Definitions.
As used in this title 17, unless the context otherwise requires:
(7.6) (b) (II) This subsection (7.6)(b) does not apply to an inmate
who has been diagnosed BY A LICENSED HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER as having
a terminal illness that is irreversible, unlikely to be cured, and likely to
cause death. by a licensed health-care provider.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-1-306, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
19-1-306. Expungement of juvenile delinquent records -
definition.
(1) (a) For the purposes of this section, "expungement" is defined
in section 19-1-103 (48) 19-1-103 (63). Upon the entry of an expungement
order, the person who is the subject of the record that has been expunged
may assert that he or she has no juvenile delinquency record. Further, the
person who is the subject of the record that has been expunged may lawfully
deny that he or she has ever been arrested, charged, adjudicated, convicted,
or sentenced in regard to the expunged case, matter, or charge.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-1.2-120, amend
(1)(d)(II)(A) as follows:
19-1.2-120. Placement preferences - cultural compact -
confidentiality.
(1) If the parental rights of an Indian child's parents have not been
terminated and the Indian child is in need of placement or continuation in
substitute care, the Indian child must be placed in the least restrictive setting
that:
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-169

(d) (II) If the Indian child's tribe has not established placement
preferences, is in accordance with the following order of preference:
(A) The INDIAN child's noncustodial parent;
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-20.5-102, repeal
(5) as follows:
22-20.5-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 20.5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(5) "Pilot program" means the pilot program to identify markers of
dyslexia and enable effective interventions operated pursuant to section
22-20.5-104.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-20.5-103, amend
(3); and repeal (2)(g) as follows:
22-20.5-103. Working group for identification of and
educational support for students with dyslexia - convened - duties -
report - repeal.
(2) The working group shall:
(g) Provide recommendations to the department concerning the
design and implementation of the pilot program.
(3) In completing the duties described in subsections (2)(c) to (2)(g)
(2)(f) of this section, the working group shall analyze and integrate, as
appropriate, the work and recommendations of other previous and ongoing
state initiatives related to improving the identification and support of
students who have dyslexia.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-104.2, amend
(5) as follows:
22-54-104.2. Legislative declaration.
(5) The general assembly further finds and declares that, for
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-169

purposes of section 17 of article IX of the state constitution, the
construction and implementation of the new at-risk measure described in
section 22-54-104.6, including the collection of the necessary data to
implement the new at-risk measure described in section 22-54-104.6 (9)(a),
22-54-104.6 is an important part of providing accountable programs to meet
state academic standards and may therefore receive funding from the state
education fund created in section 17 (4) of article IX of the state
constitution.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-104.6, repeal
(12) as follows:
22-54-104.6. Implementation of at-risk measure - legislative
declaration - definitions.
(12) Subsections (2) to (11.7) of this section are repealed, effective
July 1, 2025.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-55-103, amend
(6)(b)(I) as follows:
22-55-103. State education fund - creation - transfers to fund -
use of money in fund - permitted investments - exempt from spending
limitations - kids matter account - definition - repeal.
(6) (b) (I) The kids matter account is created in the state education
fund. Beginning IN THE July 1, 2026, state fiscal year, the state treasurer
must deposit in the account all state revenues collected from an existing tax
on sixty-five percent of one-tenth of one percent on federal taxable income,
as modified by law, of every individual, estate, trust, and corporation, as
defined in law.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-60.5-110, amend
(3)(b) as follows:
22-60.5-110. Renewal of licenses.
(3) (b) A professional licensee shall complete the ongoing
professional development within the period of time for which the
professional license is valid. The professional development may include,
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-169

but need not be limited to, in-service education programs, including training
in preventing, identifying, and responding to child sexual abuse and assault;
behavioral health training that is culturally responsive and trauma- and
evidence-informed; and laws and practices relating to the education of
students with disabilities in the classroom, including, but not limited to,
child find and inclusive learning environments; college or university credit
from an accepted institution of higher education or a community, technical,
or local district college; educational travel that meets the requirements
specified in subsection (3)(d) of this section; involvement in school reform;
service as a mentor teacher for teacher candidates participating in clinical
practice or for novice teachers, as defined in section 23-78-103; internships;
AND ongoing professional development training and experiences; and
teacher externships pursuant to section 8-83-602.5 EXPERIENCES. The state
board of education, by rule, may establish minimum criteria for professional
development; except that the criteria must not:
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-119, repeal
(6)(c) as follows:
23-1-119. Department directive - transition between K-12
education system and postsecondary education system.
(6) (c) The training must be available to educators in conjunction
with the training approved pursuant to section 22-2-127.1.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-31-313, amend
(9.5)(e)(I) as follows:
23-31-313. Healthy forests - vibrant communities - funds created
- outreach working group - loan program - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal.
(9.5) Wildfire risk mitigation public outreach and educational
campaign - legislative declaration.
(e) (I) During the 2023 through the 2027 legislative interims, the
state forester shall submit a report to the wildfire matters review committee
created in section 2-3-1602 concerning outreach efforts implemented
pursuant to this subsection (9.5) or, if the wildfire matters review committee
is repealed, to the house of representatives agriculture, water, and natural
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-169

resources committee and the senate agriculture and natural resources
committee, or their successor committees.
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-31-319, repeal (7)
as follows:
23-31-319. Forest service seedling tree nursery - necessary
upgrades and improvements - definition - funding - reports - repeal.
(7) Reporting. No later than June 1, 2023, and no later than June 1
of any other year in which the Colorado state forest service expends money
appropriated to the Colorado state university system pursuant to this section,
the state forester shall submit a report concerning the use of money received
by the Colorado state forest service pursuant to this section to the wildfire
matters review committee created in section 2-3-1602 (1)(a).
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-31-321, amend
(4)(a) as follows:
23-31-321. Wildfire mitigation and preparedness - rural grant
navigator grant program - creation - administration - reporting -
definitions.
(4) (a) On or before March 1, 2026, and on or before March 1 each
year thereafter, the forest service shall submit a written report summarizing
the competitive grant program to the wildfire matters review committee
created in section 2-3-1602 (1)(a) or, if the committee no longer exists, to
both the house of representatives agriculture, water, and natural resources
committee and the senate agriculture and natural resources committee, or
their successor committees. The forest service shall post copies of the
reports on its website.
SECTION 26. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-82-102, amend
(3)(a) introductory portion, (3)(b), (5)(b)(I), and (6)(a) introductory portion
as follows:
23-82-102. Work-based learning consortium pilot program -
created - duties - repeal.
(3) (a) Pending the receipt of sufficient funds, the department shall
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-169

convene a consortium of the following representatives after August 6, 2025
THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION:
(b) The consortium shall meet for three years after August 6, 2025
THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.
(5) The third-party platform described in subsection (4)(c) of this
section must:
(b) Work with each participating institution of higher education's
faculty to support their work aligning industry-sponsored projects with
existing content and curricula, including, but not limited to:
(I) Using models tailored to different disciplines, DISCIPLINES AND
student-team collaboration frameworks, including project guidelines and
expectations, EXPECTATIONS and faculty-integrated experiential learning
models;
(6) (a) No later than three years after August 6, 2025 THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THIS SECTION, the consortium shall complete and submit a report
to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate,
or their successor committees, on the following:
SECTION 27. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-21-115, amend
(1)(b)(IV) and (1)(b)(V) as follows:
24-21-115. Durable medical equipment supplier license -
definition - rules.
(1) As used in this section:
(b) "Durable medical equipment supplier" does not include:
(IV) A practitioner identified in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395u (18)(C) 42
U.S.C. SEC. 1395u (b)(18)(C) or a physician, if the practitioner or the
physician is supplying or providing durable medical equipment to his or her
own patients as part of the practitioner's or physician's own services; or
(V) A person or entity that supplies or provides devices directly to
a practitioner identified in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395u (18)(C) 42 U.S.C. SEC.
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-169

1395u (b)(18)(C) or a physician that require a prescription for dispensing
to the patient as part of his or her own services, whether mailed to the
practitioner or physician for fitting or directly mailed to the patient.
SECTION 28. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-2706, amend
(11)(a) as follows:
24-33.5-2706. Trauma-informed practices for school safety drills
- work group - creation - purpose - membership - notice to revisor of
statutes - definitions - repeal.
(11) (a) Subsections (2), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9) of this section
take effect if the office receives fifty thousand dollars of gifts, grants, or
donations for the purpose of this section or if the office receives an in-kind
donation as part of a public-private partnership agreement for which the
value is equal to fifty thousand dollars. The office shall notify the revisor
of statutes in writing of the date on which the condition specified in this
subsection (11)(a) has occurred by emailing the notice to
revisorofstatutes.ga@coleg.gov. Subsections (2), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and
(9) of this section take effect upon the date identified in the notice that the
commission OFFICE has received fifty thousand dollars of gifts, grants, or
donations, or an in-kind donation as part of a public-private partnership
agreement for which the value is equal to fifty thousand dollars, for the
purposes of this section or, if the notice does not specify that date, upon the
date of the notice to the revisor of statutes.
SECTION 29. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-36-502, amend (4)
as follows:
24-36-502. Definitions.
As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(4) "Qualified taxpayer" means a C corporation authorized to do
business in Colorado that has or will have an income tax liability owing to
the state. "Qualified taxpayer" also includes a C corporation that receives
or assumes a tax credit transferred in accordance with section 26-36-503
(7)(e) 24-36-503 (7)(e).
SECTION 30. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-113, amend
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-169

(4)(c) as follows:
24-38.5-113. Grid resilience and reliability roadmap - microgrid
development - stakeholder input - definitions - reporting.
(4) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(c) "Greenhouse gas" has the meaning set forth in section 2-2-322.3
(1)(a), AS THE SECTION EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL.
SECTION 31. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-116, amend
(2)(e) as follows:
24-38.5-116. Industrial and manufacturing operations clean air
grant program - creation - eligibility - fund created - gifts, grants, or
donations - transfer - legislative declaration - definitions - reporting -
repeal.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(e) "Greenhouse gas" has the meaning set forth in section 2-2-322.3
(1)(a), AS THE SECTION EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL.
SECTION 32. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-48.5-102, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
24-48.5-102. Small business assistance center.
(1) (a) In addition to the powers and duties specified in section
24-48.5-101, the Colorado office of economic development shall include
the small business assistance center, which shall provide comprehensive
information on the federal, state, and local requirements necessary to begin
a business and shall make this information available to the public. The
office shall also have available comprehensive information on the forms
and merits of employee ownership and the revolving loan program
described in section 24-48.5-124 (4).
SECTION 33. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-1101, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1.9)(a)(II)(A) as follows:
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-169

24-51-1101. Employment after service retirement - report -
definitions - repeal.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1.3), (1.8), (1.9),
and (5) of this section or part 17 of this article 51, a service retiree from any
division may be employed by an employer, whether or not in a position
subject to membership, and receive a salary without reduction in benefits
if the service retiree has not worked for any employer, as defined in section
24-51-101 (20), during the month of the effective date of retirement, and if:
(1.9) (a) (II) The provisions of this subsection (1.9) apply only if:
(A) The employer in the school division of the association that hires
the service retiree is a small rural school district, as defined in section
22-54-104.7 (9)(c), AS THE SECTION EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL, or a rural
school district as determined by the department of education based on the
geographic size of the school district and the distance of the school district
from the nearest large, urbanized area, a board of cooperative services, as
defined in section 22-5-103 (2), or a charter school, as defined in section
22-5-119 (3)(d), that is located within a small rural school district, as
defined in section 22-54-104.7 (9)(c), AS THE SECTION EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS
REPEAL, or that is located within a rural school district that enrolls six
thousand five hundred students or fewer in kindergarten through twelfth
grade;
SECTION 34. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-60-4201
as follows:
24-60-4201. Short title.
The short title of this part 41 PART 42 is the "ASLP-IC".
SECTION 35. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 24-60-4404 as
follows:
24-60-4404. Repeal of part.
If the revisor of statutes has not received the notice required by
section 24-60-4403 by June 29, 2026, this part 44 is repealed, effective June
30, 2026.
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-169

SECTION 36. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-706, repeal
(1)(h)(III) as follows:
24-72-706. Sealing of criminal conviction and criminal justice
records - processing fee - definition - repeal.
(1) Sealing of conviction records.
(h) A defendant who files a motion to seal criminal justice records
pursuant to this section shall pay a processing fee of sixty-five dollars to
cover the actual costs related to the sealing of the criminal justice records.
The court shall waive the processing fee upon a determination that:
(III) The defendant filed a motion to seal pursuant to subsection
(1)(f.5) of this section.
SECTION 37. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-3-105, amend
(1)(a)(II) as follows:
25-3-105. License - fee - rules - performance incentive system -
penalty.
(1) (a) (II) An acute treatment unit shall be assessed a fee as set forth
in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), An assisted living residence shall be
assessed a fee as set forth in section 25-27-107, and a separate fee shall be
collected pursuant to section 25-3-704 to meet the costs incurred by the
department in completing the requirements of part 7 of this article.
SECTION 38. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-3.5-108, amend
(1)(b)(IV) as follows:
25-3.5-108. EMS system sustainability task force - created -
powers and duties - membership - reports - repeal.
(1) (b) The task force consists of the following twenty voting
members:
(IV) The chair of the council created in section 25-3.5-104 (1)(a) or
the chair's designee;
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-169

SECTION 39. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-3.5-206, amend
(3)(a) as follows:
25-3.5-206. Emergency medical practice advisory council -
creation - powers and duties - emergency medical service provider
scope of practice - definitions - rules.
(3) The advisory council shall provide general technical expertise
on matters related to the provision of patient care by emergency medical
service providers and shall advise or make recommendations to the
department in the following areas:
(a) The acts and medications that emergency medical service
providers at each level of certification or licensure are authorized to
perform or administer under the direction of a physician medical director.
The advisory council shall submit a report to the house of representatives
health and insurance HUMAN SERVICES committee and the senate health and
human services committee, or any successor committees, any time the
advisory council advises or recommends authorizing the administration of
any new chemical restraint, as defined in section 26-20-102 (2). The report
must include the advisory council's reasoning for such advisement or
recommendation.
SECTION 40. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25-3.5-210 as
follows:
25-3.5-210. Report on statewide use of ketamine.
Beginning January 1, 2022, and each January 1 thereafter, the
department shall submit a report on the statewide use of ketamine by
emergency medical service providers and any complications that arise out
of such use to the house of representatives judiciary committee, the house
of representatives public and behavioral health and human services
committee, the senate health and human services committee, and the senate
judiciary committee, or their successor committees. The department shall
make the report publicly available on the department's website.
SECTION 41. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-3.5-804, amend
(3)(a) as follows:
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-169

25-3.5-804. Tobacco education, prevention, and cessation
programs - review committee - grants - reimbursement for expenses -
rules.
(3) (a) The division shall review the applications received pursuant
to this part 8 and make recommendations to the state board regarding those
entities that may receive grants and the amounts of the grants. On and after
October 1, 2005, the review committee shall review the applications
received pursuant to this part 8 and submit to the state board and the
director of the department recommended grant recipients, grant amounts,
and the duration of each grant. Within thirty days after receiving the review
committee's recommendations, the director shall submit the director's
recommendations to the state board. The review committee's
recommendations regarding grantees of the Tony Grampsas youth services
grant program, created in section 26-6.8-102, pursuant to section 25-3.5-805
(5) shall be submitted to the state board and the department of human
services. Within thirty days after receiving the review committee's
recommendations, the department of human services shall submit its
recommendations to the state board. The state board has the final authority
to approve the grants under this part 8. If the state board disapproves a
recommendation for a grant recipient, the review committee may submit a
replacement recommendation within thirty days. In reviewing grant
applications for programs to provide tobacco education, prevention, and
cessation programs for persons with behavioral or mental health disorders,
the division or the review committee shall consult with the programs for
public psychiatry at the university of Colorado health sciences center, the
National Alliance on Mental Illness, the mental health association of
MENTAL HEALTH Colorado, and the department of human services.
SECTION 42. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-1-115.5, amend
(1) introductory portion as follows:
25.5-1-115.5. Medical assistance fraud - report.
(1) Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before
November 1, 2017, and each November 1 thereafter, the state department
shall submit a written report to the joint budget committee; to the house of
representatives judiciary committee and the house of representatives public
and behavioral health and human services committee, or their successor
committees; and to the senate judiciary committee and the senate health and
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-169

human services committee, or their successor committees, concerning fraud
in the medicaid program. The state department shall compile a single,
comprehensive report that includes the information described in this
subsection (1), as well as information that the attorney general provides to
the state department pursuant to section 25.5-4-303.3. The state department
shall report to the general assembly concerning the fraudulent receipt of
medicaid benefits, including, at a minimum:
SECTION 43. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-1-133, amend
(5)(a) as follows:
25.5-1-133. Access to behavioral health services for individuals
under twenty-one years of age - rules - report - repeal.
(5) (a) Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before
November 1, 2025, and on or before November 1 each year thereafter, the
state department shall report to the house of representatives public and
behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and
human services committee, or their successor committees, regarding the
utilization of the services described in subsection (2) of this section. The
contents of the report must be determined through the stakeholder process
described in subsection (4) of this section. At a minimum, the report must
include data on the utilization of services, by code, and any differences in
utilization within the school health services program authorized by section
25.5-5-318.
SECTION 44. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-301, amend
(1)(b) as follows:
25.5-4-301. Recoveries - overpayments - penalties - interest -
adjustments - liens - review or audit procedures - cash fund - rules -
definitions.
(1) (b) Member income applied pursuant to section 25.5-4-209 (1)
does not disqualify any member RECIPIENT, as defined in section 26-2-103
(8), from receiving benefits pursuant to this article 4, article 5 or 6 of this
title 25.5, or public assistance pursuant to article 2 of title 26, and does not
disqualify an individual from receiving child care assistance pursuant to part
1 of article 4 of title 26.5. If, at any time during the continuance of medical
benefits, the member gains possession of property having a value in excess
PAGE 18-SENATE BILL 26-169

of that amount set by law or by the rules of the state department or receives
any increase in income, the member shall notify the county department and
the county department may, after investigation, either revoke the medical
benefits or alter the amount of medical benefits, as the circumstances may
require.
SECTION 45. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-402.8, amend
(4)(a)(I) as follows:
25.5-4-402.8. Hospital transparency report and requirements -
definitions.
(4) (a) On or before January 15, 2020, and on or before January 15
each year thereafter, the state department shall submit the annual hospital
transparency report to:
(I) The house of representatives health and insurance committee and
the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human
services committee, or any successor committee;
SECTION 46. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-505.5, amend
(7)(a) introductory portion as follows:
25.5-4-505.5. Federal authorization related to persons involved
in the criminal justice system - report - rules - legislative declaration.
(7) (a) Beginning July 1, 2025, and each July 1 thereafter, the state
department shall annually report to the house of representatives public and
behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and
human services committee, or their successor committees, the following
information:
SECTION 47. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-412, amend
(15)(c) as follows:
25.5-5-412. Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly -
services - eligibility - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.
(15) (c) The state department shall continually analyze the
reimbursement methodology for PACE entities and provide an update to the
PAGE 19-SENATE BILL 26-169

house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services
committee, the senate health and human services committee, and the joint
budget committee, or their successor committees, of any new methodology
requirements that incorporate encounter data and any associated cost to the
state department in overseeing PACE entities.
SECTION 48. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-6-206, amend
(1) as follows:
25.5-6-206. Personal needs benefits - amount - patient personal
needs trust fund required - funeral and final disposition expenses -
penalty for illegal retention and use.
(1) The state department, pursuant to its rules, may include in
medical care benefits provided under this article 6 and articles 4 and 5 of
this title 25.5 reasonable amounts for the personal needs of any member
receiving nursing facility services or intermediate care facilities for
individuals with intellectual disabilities, if the member is not otherwise
eligible for the amounts from other categories of public assistance, but the
amounts for personal needs must not be less than the minimum amount
provided for in subsection (2) of this section. Payments for funeral and final
disposition expenses upon the death of a member may be provided under
rules of the state department in the same manner as provided to members
RECIPIENTS of public assistance as defined by section 26-2-103 (8).
SECTION 49. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-1-121.5, amend
(5)(e) as follows:
26-1-121.5. Public assistance funding model - workload study -
evaluation - report - definitions - repeal.
(5) The funding model must include:
(e) Any modifications to the public and medical assistance program
system that have been implemented by the department or the department of
health care policy and financing. including those that may have been
recommended by the third party pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section
and provided to the joint budget committee pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of
this section.
PAGE 20-SENATE BILL 26-169

SECTION 50. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-2-709.5, amend
(3) introductory portion as follows:
26-2-709.5. Exit interviews and follow-up interviews of
participants - reporting.
(3) Beginning January 2023, and each January thereafter, the state
department shall submit a report to the house of representatives public and
behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and
human services committee, or their successor committees, as part of its
"State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent
(SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203, on
the effectiveness of the works program. To the extent practicable, the state
department may request a county department to provide any information
and data that may be necessary to develop the report, including information
and data from exit interviews conducted by the county departments pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section. Any data used must protect personal
identifying information of the participants and the participants' family
members. At a minimum, the report must include:
SECTION 51. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-2-725, amend (5)
as follows:
26-2-725. Outreach and engagement plan - family voice
participation.
(5) Beginning January 2023, and each January thereafter, the state
department shall include information on the implementation of the
requirements in this section in its report to the house of representatives
public and behavioral health and human services committee and the senate
health and human services committee, or their successor committees, as part
of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent
(SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203.
SECTION 52. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-6-923, amend
(6)(b) and (7) as follows:
26-6-923. Residential child care provider training academy -
clinical quality and oversight - report - rules - definition.
PAGE 21-SENATE BILL 26-169

(6) (b) Upon implementation of the behavioral health capacity
tracking system created pursuant to section 27-60-104.5, the behavioral
health administration shall provide to the house of representatives public
and behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health
and human services committee, or their successor committees, a report on
residential child care provider denials of care.
(7) No later than July 1, 2026, and each July thereafter, the state
department shall submit an annual report to the house of representatives
public and behavioral health and human services committee and the senate
health and human services committee, or their successor committees, on the
implementation of quality standards developed pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section.
SECTION 53. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-11-210, amend (2)
as follows:
26-11-210. Adequacy review - appropriation for senior services
- report.
(2) Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), no later than
November 1 of each year after the adequacy review is conducted pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section, the state department shall report the
findings of the adequacy review to the house of representatives public and
behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and
human services committee, or their successor committees, and the joint
budget committee.
SECTION 54. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-60-109, amend (5)
as follows:
27-60-109. Youth mental health services program - established
- report - rules - definitions - repeal.
(5) On or before June 30 of each year, the state department shall
report to the house of representatives public and behavioral health and
human services committee and the senate health and human services
committee, or their successor committees, regarding the number of youth
who received services under the program, excluding any personally
identifiable information in accordance with state and federal law;
PAGE 22-SENATE BILL 26-169

information in aggregate about the services provided to youth under the
program; other relevant information regarding the program; and the
information reported to the BHA by the vendor pursuant to subsection (4.5)
of this section.
SECTION 55. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-60-404, amend
(2)(a) as follows:
27-60-404. Grant program reporting requirements.
(2) (a) On or before January 31 of each year, the house of
representatives judiciary committee, the house of representatives public and
behavioral health and human services committee, the senate health and
human services committee, and the senate judiciary committee, or their
successor committees, shall hold a joint hearing on the grant program. At
the hearing, the state department shall report to the committees about the
grant program, which must include an overview of the grant program,
information on the type of services funded with a grant award, and where
services were provided.
SECTION 56. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-1-203.5, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
29-1-203.5. Separate legal entity established under section
29-1-203 - legal status - authority to exercise special district powers -
additional financing powers.
(1) (a) Any combination of counties, municipalities, special districts,
or other political subdivisions of this state that are each authorized to own,
operate, finance, or otherwise provide public improvements, functions,
services, or facilities may enter into a contract under section 29-1-203 to
establish a separate legal entity to provide any such public improvements,
functions, services, or facilities. In addition, such a separate legal entity may
be established as authorized by sections 32-19-119 (1)(w.5) 32-9-119
(1)(w.5), 32-22-106 (1)(s.5), 43-1-106 (8)(q.5), and 43-4-806 (6)(p.5). Any
separate legal entity established is a political subdivision and public
corporation of the state and is separate from the parties to the contract if the
contract or an amendment to the contract states that the entity is formed in
conformity with the provisions of this section and that the provisions of this
section apply to the entity.
PAGE 23-SENATE BILL 26-169

SECTION 57. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-10-421, repeal (6)
as follows:
30-10-421. Filing surcharge.
(6) As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)
(b) Repealed.
(c) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)
SECTION 58. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 37-23-114, amend (6)
as follows:
37-23-114. State tax laws to apply.
(6) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, on or after July 1, 2024,
a drainage district, an assignee of a drainage district, a holder of a certificate
of purchase, or a county treasurer shall follow the procedures established in
article 11.5 of title 39 and shall not follow the procedures established in this
section, sections 37-23-115 to 37-23-118, SECTION or article 11 of title 39
concerning the issuance of a tax deed. Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, on or after July 1, 2024, a lot or parcel of land shall not be struck
off to a drainage district and a county treasurer shall not issue a certificate
of sale, certificate of purchase, or tax deed pursuant to this section or article
11 of title 39 to the extent such actions would be inconsistent with the
requirements of article 11.5 of title 39.
SECTION 59. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 37-43-183, amend (2)
as follows:
37-43-183. Application.
(2) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, on or after July 1, 2024,
a county treasurer shall follow the procedures established in article 11.5 of
title 39 and shall not follow the procedures established in this section,
sections 37-43-184 to 37-43-189, SECTION or article 11 of title 39
concerning striking off land or the issuance of a certificate of sale or tax
PAGE 24-SENATE BILL 26-169

deed. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, on or after July 1, 2024, a
lot or parcel of land shall not be struck off to a county or an irrigation
district and a county treasurer shall not issue a certificate or tax deed
pursuant to sections 37-43-184 to 37-43-189 or article 11 of title 39.
SECTION 60. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-12-402, amend
(2)(a.5)(I)(A) and (3) as follows:
38-12-402. Protection for victim-survivors of unlawful sexual
behavior, stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse.
(2) (a.5) (I) For the purposes of subsection (2)(a) of this section, to
provide evidence that the tenant is a victim-survivor of unlawful sexual
behavior, stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse, a tenant may
provide to the landlord at least one of the following:
(A) A self-attestation affidavit that states the tenant is a
victim-survivor of unlawful sexual behavior, stalking, domestic violence,
or domestic abuse and that the incident of unlawful sexual behavior,
stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse is the cause of, or
contributed to, termination of the residential tenancy. If a landlord receives
documentation pursuant to this subsection (2)(a.5)(I) that contains
conflicting information, the landlord may require a tenant to submit a letter
signed by a qualified third party pursuant to this subsection (2)(a.5)(I)(B)
OF THIS SECTION. The self-attestation affidavit must include the name of the
party who is allegedly responsible for the unlawful sexual behavior,
stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse, if the name of the party is
known and if the tenant determines it is safe to provide.
(3) A landlord shall not terminate a residential rental agreement or
lease agreement or eviction of EVICT a tenant solely because the tenant is
the victim-survivor of unlawful sexual behavior, stalking, domestic
violence, or domestic abuse.
SECTION 61. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-13-102, amend
(13.5) as follows:
38-13-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 13, unless the context otherwise requires:
PAGE 25-SENATE BILL 26-169

(13.5) "Legacy preneed contract beneficiary" means, for any legacy
preneed contract entered into on or after July 1, 1967, any person specified
in the legacy preneed contract upon whose death a final resting place,
merchandise, as defined in section 10-15-102 (1) SECTION 10-15-102 (10),
or services, as defined in section 10-15-102 (16), shall be provided,
delivered, or performed.
SECTION 62. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-554, repeal
(2)(i.5); and add (2)(g.5) as follows:
39-22-554. Heat pump technology and thermal energy network
tax credit - tax preference performance statement - legislative
declaration - definitions - repeal.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(g.5) "HEAT PUMP" MEANS AN ELECTRICALLY POWERED
MECHANICAL DEVICE THAT USES THE REFRIGERATION CYCLE TO TRANSFER
THERMAL ENERGY FROM ONE LOCATION TO ANOTHER.
(i.5) "Heat pump" means an electrically powered mechanical device
that uses the refrigeration cycle to transfer thermal energy from one location
to another.
SECTION 63. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-559, repeal
(2)(c) as follows:
39-22-559. Film incentive tax credit - tax preference
performance statement - review - legislative declaration - definitions -
repeal.
(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(c) "Obscene" has the same meaning as set forth in section 18-7-101
(2).
SECTION 64. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-5502, amend
(4)(b) and (11); and repeal (16) as follows:
PAGE 26-SENATE BILL 26-169

39-22-5502. Definitions.
As used in this part 55, unless the context otherwise requires:
(4) "Certified transit-oriented community" means:
(b) In calendar year 2028 and each subsequent calendar year, a
transit-oriented community, as defined in section 29-35-202 (11), that has
both submitted the housing opportunity goal report described in section
29-35-204 (10) SECTION 29-35-204 (8) to the division and had the division
confirm that the transit-oriented community has met its housing opportunity
goal.
(11) "Metropolitan planning organization" has the same meaning as
set forth in section 29-35-103 (12) SECTION 29-35-103 (13).
(16) "Transit center" has the same meaning as set forth in section
29-35-202 (11).
SECTION 65. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-27-105, amend
(1.3)(b) as follows:
39-27-105. Collection of tax on gasoline and special fuel - rules
- repeal.
(1.3) (b) The executive director of the department of revenue, if said
executive director deems it necessary in order to ensure payment of the tax
imposed by this part 1 or to facilitate the administration of this part 1, may
require a report of a distributor and payment of the tax due by the distributor
to be made for other than, or in addition to, the monthly period. When such
option is authorized, the amount of surety bond required by section
39-27-104 (2) may be adjusted by the executive director proportionately
with the change in liability.
SECTION 66. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-29-108, amend (1)
introductory portion as follows:
39-29-108. Allocation of severance tax revenues - definitions -
repeal.
PAGE 27-SENATE BILL 26-169

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, The total
gross receipts realized from the severance taxes imposed on minerals and
mineral fuels under the provisions of this article shall be credited as
follows:
SECTION 67. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-114, amend
(12)(f) as follows:
42-2-114. License issued - voluntary disability identifier symbol
- fees - rules - report - definitions.
(12) (f) By January 15, 2023, and each year thereafter, the
department shall report to the house of representatives health and insurance
HUMAN SERVICES committee and transportation TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING,
and local government committee and the senate health and human services
committee and transportation and energy committee, or their successor
committees, on the percentage of persons issued a driver's license who have
requested a disability identifier symbol issued in accordance with this
subsection (12) in the previous calendar year.
SECTION 68. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-303, amend
(6)(f) as follows:
42-2-303. Contents of identification card - disability identifier
symbol - rules - definition.
(6) (f) By January 15, 2023, and each year thereafter, the department
shall report to the house of representatives health and insurance HUMAN
SERVICES committee and transportation and TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING,
AND local government committee and the senate health and human services
committee and transportation and energy committee, or their successor
committees, on the percentage of persons issued an identification card who
have requested a disability identifier symbol issued in accordance with this
subsection (6) in the previous calendar year.
SECTION 69. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-113, amend
(9.5)(e) as follows:
42-3-113. Records of application and registration - disability of
a driver - rules - report - definitions.
PAGE 28-SENATE BILL 26-169

(9.5) (e) By January 15, 2023, and each year thereafter, the
department shall report to the house of representatives health and insurance
HUMAN SERVICES committee and transportation TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING,
and local government committee and the senate health and human services
committee and transportation and energy committee, or their successor
committees, on the percentage of persons registering a vehicle who have
disclosed disability information in accordance with this subsection (9.5) in
the previous calendar year.
SECTION 70. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-234, amend (2)
as follows:
42-4-234. Slow-moving vehicles - display of emblem - penalty.
(2) The executive director of the department shall adopt standards
and specifications for such emblem, position of the mounting thereof, and
requirements for certification of conformance with the standards and
specifications adopted by the American society of agricultural engineers
AMERICAN SOCIETY OF AGRICULTURAL AND BIOLOGICAL ENGINEERS, OR ITS
SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION, concerning such emblems. The requirements of
such emblem shall be in addition to any lighting device required by law.
SECTION 71. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-205, amend
(6.5); and repeal (6.4) and (6.7) as follows:
43-4-205. Allocation of fund - repeal.
(6.4) Money transferred from the general fund to the highway users
tax fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 (5)(a)(II) and (5)(b)(II) is allocated
and expended as follows:
(a) Fifty percent of the money is paid to the county treasurers of the
respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general
assembly, and allocated and expended as provided in section 43-4-207; and
(b) Fifty percent of the money is paid to the cities and incorporated
towns, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and
allocated and expended as provided in section 43-4-208 (2) and (6)(a).
(6.5) (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6.4) and (6.7)
PAGE 29-SENATE BILL 26-169

of this section, The revenue accrued to and transferred to the highway users
tax fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 or 39-26-123 (4)(a) or appropriated
to the highway users tax fund pursuant to House Bill 02-1389, enacted in
2002, must be paid to the state highway fund for allocation to the
department of transportation and expended as provided in section 43-4-206
(2).
(b) Repealed.
(c) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 296, § 61, effective August
8, 2005.)
(d) Repealed.
(6.7) Money transferred from the general fund to the highway users
tax fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 (5)(b.5) must be allocated and
expended in accordance with the formula specified in subsection (6)(b) of
this section.
SECTION 72. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-207, amend (1)
and (2)(b) introductory portion as follows:
43-4-207. County allocation.
(1) After paying the costs of the Colorado state patrol and any other
costs of the department, exclusive of highway construction, highway
improvements, or highway maintenance, that are appropriated by the
general assembly, the money including money transferred from the general
fund to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 (5)(a)(II)
and (5)(b)(II), that section 43-4-205 requires to be paid from the highway
users tax fund to the county treasurers of the respective counties shall be
paid to the county treasurers of the respective counties, subject to annual
appropriation by the general assembly, and shall be allocated and expended
as provided in this section. The money received is allocated to the counties
as provided by law and shall be expended by the counties only on the
construction, engineering, reconstruction, maintenance, repair, equipment,
improvement, and administration of the county highway systems and any
other public highways, including any state highways, together with
acquisition of rights-of-way and access rights for the same, for the planning,
designing, engineering, acquisition, installation, construction, repair,
PAGE 30-SENATE BILL 26-169

reconstruction, maintenance, operation, or administration of transit-related
projects, including, but not limited to, designated bicycle or pedestrian lanes
of highway and infrastructure needed to integrate different transportation
modes within a multimodal transportation system, and for no other purpose;
except that money received pursuant to section 43-4-205 (6.3) shall be
expended by the counties only for road safety projects, as defined in section
43-4-803 (21). The amount expended for administrative purposes shall not
exceed five percent of each county's share of the funds available.
(2) For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 1989, and each fiscal
year thereafter, for the purpose of allocating money in the highway users tax
fund to the various counties throughout the state, the following method is
adopted:
(b) All money credited to the fund in excess of eighty-six million
seven hundred thousand dollars and all money transferred to the fund
pursuant to section 24-75-219 (5)(a)(II) and (5)(b)(II) that is required by
section 43-4-205 (6.4)(a) and subsection (1) of this section to be paid to the
county treasurers of the respective counties is allocated to the counties in
the following manner:
SECTION 73. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 44-30-1517 as
follows:
44-30-1517. Ballot issue - retain and spend sports betting tax
revenue - definition.
(1) As used in this section, "ballot issue" means the question
submitted to voters pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(2) At the statewide election held in November 2024, the secretary
of state shall submit to the registered electors of the state for their approval
or rejection the following ballot issue: "Without raising taxes, may the state
keep and spend all sports betting tax revenue above voter-approved limits
to fund water conservation and protection projects instead of refunding
revenue to casinos?"
(3) If a majority of the electors voting on the ballot issue vote
"Yes/For", this constitutes voter approval to avoid the potential refund
required by section 44-30-1519.
PAGE 31-SENATE BILL 26-169

(4) For purposes of section 1-5-407, the ballot issue is a proposition.
Section 1-40-106 (3)(d) does not apply to the ballot issue.
SECTION 74. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-35-503, amend
as added by House Bill 26-1001 (1) as follows:
29-35-503. Residential developments on qualifying properties.
(1) Residential developments on qualifying properties. Except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, on or after December 31, 2027,
subject to an administrative approval process and in accordance with this
part 5, a subject jurisdiction shall allow a residential development to be
constructed on a qualifying property if the qualifying property does not
contain an exempt parcel; except that, if on December 31, 2027, a subject
jurisdiction is actively in the process of updating the subject jurisdiction's
zoning or development code to comply with the requirements of this part 5,
the subject jurisdiction shall complete the updates and shall comply with all
requirements of this part 5 by June 31 JUNE 30, 2028.
SECTION 75. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-124, amend as
added by House Bill 26-1007 (7)(c)(IV)(A) as follows:
40-2-124. Renewable energy standards - qualifying retail and
wholesale utilities - definitions - net metering - legislative declaration
- rules.
(7) (c) (IV) A municipally owned utility may deny a proposed
customer-owned meter collar adapter only if:
(A) The proposed meter collar adapter does not meet the
requirements set forth in subsection (7)(c)(II) SUBSECTION (7)(c)(III) of this
section; and
SECTION 76. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 32-SENATE BILL 26-169

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
PAGE 33-SENATE BILL 26-169

and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 34-SENATE BILL 26-169

PAGE 35-SENATE BILL 26-169

APPENDIX
C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
2-2-307 (3)(d) 1 Repeals this provision as obsolete because it applies to
legislative expenses incurred by members serving on various
2025 interim committees. (See SB25-199, chapter 149, page
569, Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
2-2-2103 (1)(b)(VI) 2 Provides notice that the interim and final reports referenced in
this provision were created in accordance with part 2 of article
35.3 of title 22 prior to its repeal, effective January 1, 2024.
(See HB22-1215, chapter 372, page 2653, Session Laws of
Colorado 2022.)
6-4.5-103 (b) and (c) 3 Changes internal references to conform with the Uniform
Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act as it was adopted by the
Uniform Law Commission. (See the Uniform Antitrust
Pre-Merger Notification Act, Uniform Law Commission,
https://www.uniformlaws.org, and SB25-126, chapter 419,
page 2367, Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
6-23-101 IP 4 Broadens the applicability of the definitions listed in this
section from this section to article 23 of title 6. This section,
added during the enactment of article 23 of title 6 by
HB17-1115, was created to define the terms used throughout
the article; however, the introductory portion of the section
restricts the use of the terms to this section only. (See
HB17-1115, chapter 151, page 511, Session Laws of Colorado
2017.)
8-3.7-205 (1) 5 Deletes text within this provision as obsolete due to the repeal
of subsection (6) of this section, effective July 1, 2025. (See
section 8-3.7-205 (6), C.R.S. 2024, and HB24-1280, chapter
437, page 3058, Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
8-83-601 (4.5) 6 Repeals this subsection as obsolete due to the repeal of the
statewide teacher externship program created in section
8-83-602.5, effective September 1, 2025. (See section
8-83-602.5, C.R.S. 2024, and HB23-1198, chapter 239, page
1287, Session Laws of Colorado 2023.)
11-35-101 (1) 7 Deletes cross references to subdivisions of subsections (2),
(2.1), and (2.5) of section 39-27-104 due to the repeal of
subsections (2) and (2.1), effective December 31, 2022, and
subsection (2.5), effective January 1, 2022. (See section
39-27-104 (2)(g) and (2.1)(e), C.R.S. 2021, and HB21-1322,
chapter 453, page 3011, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.)
PAGE 36-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
11-35-101.5 (1) 8 Deletes a cross reference to section 39-27-104 (2.1)(c) due to
the repeal of the section, effective December 31, 2022. (See
section 39-27-104 (2.1)(e), C.R.S. 2021, and HB21-1322,
chapter 453, page 3011, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.)
11-103-203 (6) 9 Corrects a contextual error originating in the introduced
version of HB24-1351. (See HB24-1351, chapter 461, page
3201, Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
11-103-403 (3) 10 Corrects a contextual error originating in the introduced
version of HB24-1351. (See HB24-1351, chapter 461, page
3203, Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
12-165-108 (3) 11 Corrects a typographical error originating in the introduced
version of HB21-1195 that resulted in an incorrect cross
reference to the section addressing the renewal, expiration,
reinstatement, and delinquency fees for licenses issued under
the provisions of title 12. (See HB21-1195, chapter 398, page
2641, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.)
13-5.5-104 (4.5)(e) 12 Changes the repeal date of this subsection from "July 1, 2028"
to "July 1, 2030" to retain until obsolete the 2029 expiration
date of the initial terms of the commissioners representing the
twenty-third judicial district on the state commission on
judicial performance. This corrects an error originating in the
introduced version of HB25-1298. (See HB25-1298, chapter
354, page 1910, Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
17-1-102 (7.6)(b)(II) 13 Corrects a grammatical error originating in the senate
judiciary committee report amending the introduced version
of SB25-190. (See the 2025 Senate Journal for March 27,
page 585, and SB25-190, chapter 286, page 1473, Session
Laws of Colorado 2025.)
19-1-306 (1)(a) 14 Updates a cross reference to correspond with the relocation of
provisions by SB21-059. (See SB21-059, chapter 136, page
753, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.)
19-1.2-120 (1)(d)(II)(A) 15 Changes "child" to "Indian child" to accurately reflect the
term as defined in section 19-1.2-103 (10) for article 1.2 of
title 19. The error originated in the introduced version of
HB25-1204. (See section 5.7.21 of the Colorado Legislative
Drafting Manual, Online Edition, Revised December 2025,
and HB25-1204, chapter 338, page 1806, Session Laws of
Colorado 2025.)
22-20.5-102 (5) 16 Repeals this subsection as obsolete due to the repeal of the
PAGE 37-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
pilot program created in section 22-20.5-104, effective July 1,
2024. (See section 22-20.5-104 (5), C.R.S. 2023 and
HB22-1390, chapter 237, page 1747, Session Laws of
Colorado 2022.)
22-20.5-103 17 Repeals subsection (2)(g) as obsolete due to the repeal of the
(2)(g) and (3) pilot program created in section 22-20.5-104, effective July 1,
2024, and removes subsection (2)(g) from a list of provisions
in subsection (3) as a conforming amendment. (See
HB22-1390, chapter 237, page 1747, Session Laws of
Colorado 2022.)
22-54-104.2 (5) 18 Deletes text within this subsection as obsolete due to the
repeal of section 22-54-104.6 (9)(a), effective July 1, 2025.
(See section 22-54-104.6 (12), C.R.S. 2024, and HB25-1320,
chapter 236, page 1170, Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
22-54-104.6 (12) 19 Repeals as obsolete a future-repeal provision requiring the
repeal of specific provisions, effective July 1, 2025. (See
HB25-1320, chapter 236, page 1170, Session Laws of
Colorado 2025.)
22-55-103 (6)(b)(I) 20 Clarifies that the monetary deposit required in this provision
must take place in the state fiscal year commencing July 1,
2026. (See the 2025 Senate Journal for May 2, page 1287, and
HB25-1320, chapter 236, page 1173, Session Laws of
Colorado 2025.)
22-60.5-110 (3)(b) 21 Removes teacher externships from the list of potential
programs for professional licensees to complete for
professional development because section 8-83-602.5, the
section creating the teacher externship program, repealed,
effective September 1, 2025. (See section 8-83-602.5, C.R.S.
2024, and HB23-1198, chapter 239, page 1287, Session Laws
of Colorado 2023.)
23-1-119 (6)(c) 22 Repeals this subsection as obsolete due to the repeal of
section 22-2-127.1, effective July 1, 2025. (See section
22-2-127.1 (4), C.R.S. 2024, and HB22-1366, chapter 244,
page 1814, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.)
23-31-313 (9.5)(e)(I) 23 Repeals the requirement that the state forester submit a report
to the wildfire matters review committee because the
committee no longer exists due to the repeal of section
2-3-1602, effective September 1, 2025. (See section 2-3-1602,
C.R.S. 2024, and SB18-039, chapter 219, page 1397, Session
PAGE 38-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
Laws of Colorado 2018.)
23-31-319 (7) 24 Repeals the requirement that the state forester submit a report
to the wildfire matters review committee because the
committee no longer exists due to the repeal of section
2-3-1602, effective September 1, 2025. (See section 2-3-1602,
C.R.S. 2024, and SB18-039, chapter 219, page 1397, Session
Laws of Colorado 2018.)
23-31-321 (4)(a) 25 Repeals the requirement that the state forester submit a report
to the wildfire matters review committee because the
committee no longer exists due to the repeal of section
2-3-1602, effective September 1, 2025. (See section 2-3-1602,
C.R.S. 2024, and SB18-039, chapter 219, page 1397, Session
Laws of Colorado 2018.)
23-82-102 IP(3)(a), 26 • [IP(3)(a), (3)(b), and IP(6)(a)] Corrects the effective date of
(3)(b), (5)(b)(I), three provisions due to publication errors that occurred when
and IP(6)(a) preparing the Colorado Revised Statutes 2025. (See the Gray
Book 2026, page 21, section 23-82-104 (1), C.R.S. 2025, and
HB25-1186, chapter 318, page 1662, Session Laws of
Colorado 2025.)
• [(5)(b)(I)] Restructures the sentence to correct a punctuation
error originating in the house education committee report
amending the introduced version of HB25-1186 and clarifies
a change made in the Gray Book 2026. (See the Gray Book
2026, page 21, the 2025 House Journal for March 6, page 588,
and HB25-1186, chapter 318, page 1662, Session Laws of
Colorado 2025.
24-21-115 27 Corrects cross references within this subsection to a provision
(1)(b)(IV) and (1)(b)(V) of the United States Code identifying practitioners that are
subject to the provisions of subsection (18) of paragraph (b)
of section 1395u of title 42. The error in subsection (1)(b)(IV)
originated in the introduced version of HB15-1211 and the
error in subsection (1)(b)(V) originated in the house health,
insurance, and environment committee report amending the
introduced version of HB15-1211. (See 2015 House Journal
for February 27, page 370, and HB15-1211, chapter 48, page
117, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.)
24-33.5-2706 (11)(a) 28 Changes "commission" to "office" to correct an error
originating in the senate appropriations committee report
amending the introduced version of SB25-027. (See the 2025
Senate Journal for April 11, page 811, and SB25-027, chapter
363, page 1969, Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
PAGE 39-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
24-36-502 (4) 29 Corrects a cross reference to the section allowing the transfer
of tax liabilities to a qualified taxpayer to avoid a penalty. The
error originated in the house appropriations committee report
amending the introduced version of HB25B-1004. (See the
2025 House Journal for the First Extraordinary Session,
August 21, page 14, and HB25B-1004, chapter 8, pages 32
and 33, Session Laws for the First Extraordinary Session
2025.)
24-38.5-113 (4)(c) 30 Continues the use of the definition of greenhouse gas, as the
definition existed in section 2-2-322.3 prior to the section's
repeal, effective September 1, 2025, to preserve the legislative
intent of the section. (See HB19-1188, chapter 339, page
3102, Session Laws of Colorado 2019, and HB22-1249,
chapter 302, page 2189, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.)
24-38.5-116 (2)(e) 31 Continues the use of the definition of greenhouse gas, as the
definition existed in section 2-2-322.3 prior to the section's
repeal, effective September 1, 2025, to preserve the legislative
intent of the section. (See HB19-1188, chapter 339, page
3102, Session Laws of Colorado 2019, and SB22-193, chapter
300, page 2142, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.)
24-48.5-102 (1)(a) 32 Deletes text within this subsection as obsolete due to the
repeal of section 24-48.5-124, effective July 1, 2025. (See
section 24-48.5-124, C.R.S. 2024, and HB21-1241, chapter
166, page 929, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.)
24-51-1101 33 • [(IP(1)] Deletes an internal reference to subsection (1.3) of
IP(1) and (1.9)(a)(II)(A) this section due to the repeal of subsection (1.3), effective
July 1, 2025. (See section 24-51-1101 (1.3)(d), C.R.S. 2024,
and HB22-1057, chapter 24, page 156, Session Laws of
Colorado 2024.)
• [(1.9)(a)(II)(A)] Continues the use of the definition of small
rural school district, as the definition existed in section
22-54-104.7 (9)(c) prior to the section's repeal, effective July
1, 2025, to preserve the legislative intent of the section. (See
section 22-54-104.7 (9)(c), C.R.S. 2024, SB23-287, chapter
189, page 928, Session Laws of Colorado 2023, and
SB24-099, chapter 56, page 193, Session Laws of Colorado
2024.)
24-60-4201 34 Corrects the citation to the statutory provisions that
encompass the ASLP-IC. Part 41 of article 60 of title 24, as
added by SB21-021, was renumbered by revision to part 42 of
article 60 of title 24. (See the 2021 Red Book, footnote 243,
PAGE 40-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
Colorado General Assembly website, and SB21-021, chapter
194, page 1019, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.)
24-60-4404 35 Repeals this section as obsolete. The commissioner of
education filed the notice required by this section on October
23, 2023, nullifying the repeal required by this section if
notice is not received. (See the Notices to the Revisor of
Statutes, Colorado General Assembly website, and
HB23-1064, chapter 18, page 69, Session Laws of Colorado
2023.)
24-72-706 (1)(h)(III) 36 Repeals the requirement that a court waive the processing fee
for a defendant filing a motion under the provisions of
subsection (1)(f.5) of this section due to the repeal of
subsection (1)(f.5), effective July 1, 2025. (See the Gray Book
2025, page 23, and HB24-1133, chapter 384, page 2620,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25-3-105 (1)(a)(II) 37 Repeals the requirement that acute treatment units pay the
fees outlined in subsection (1)(c) of this section due to the
repeal of subsection (1)(c), effective July 1, 2022. (See
section 25-3-105 (1)(a)(II), C.R.S. 2021, and HB19-1237,
chapter 413, page 3640, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.)
25-3.5-108 (1)(b)(IV) 38 Deletes redundant descriptive language for a term that is
statutorily defined. (See section 25-3.5-103 (4.7), C.R.S.
2025, and section 5.7.21 of the Colorado Legislative Drafting
Manual, Online Edition, Revised December 2025.)
25-3.5-206 (3)(a) 39 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25-3.5-210 40 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25-3.5-804 (3)(a) 41 Changes "Mental Health Association of Colorado" to "Mental
Health Colorado" to correctly cite the name of the
organization. (See the Colorado Mental Health's website at
https://www.mentalhealthcolorado.org/about-us/.)
25.5-1-115.5 IP(1) 42 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
PAGE 41-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25.5-1-133 (5)(a) 43 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25.5-4-301 (1)(b) 44 Changes "member" to "recipient" to undo an errant
terminology change made in SB24-176. (See SB24-176,
chapter 152, page 633, Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25.5-4-402.8 (4)(a)(I) 45 Updates the name of a house committee and deletes a house
committee to conform with house rule 25. (See the Legislative
Rule Book, Updated November 2025, page 11, and
HR24-1001, page 4487, Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25.5-4-505.5 IP(7)(a) 46 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25.5-5-412 (15)(c) 47 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
25.5-6-206 (1) 48 Changes "members" to "recipients" to undo an errant
terminology change made in SB24-176. (See SB24-176,
chapter 152, page 664, Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
26-1-121.5 (5)(e) 49 Deletes text within this provision as obsolete due to the repeal
of subsection (2) of this section, effective June 30, 2024. (See
section 26-1-121.5 (2)(e), C.R.S. 2023, and SB22-235, chapter
409, page 2890, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.)
26-2-709.5 IP(3) 50 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
26-2-725 (5) 51 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
26-6-923 (6)(b) and (7) 52 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
PAGE 42-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
26-11-210 (2) 53 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
27-60-109 (5) 54 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
27-60-404 (2)(a) 55 Updates the name of a house committee to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, and HR24-1001, page 4487,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
29-1-203.5 (1)(a) 56 Corrects a typographical error originating in the senate
transportation and energy committee report amending the
introduced version of SB24-184 that resulted in an incorrect
cross reference to the regional transportation district's
authority to establish a separate legal entity. (See the 2024
Senate Journal for March 28, page 615, and SB24-184,
chapter 186, page 1049, Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
30-10-421 (6) 57 Repeals this subsection as inoperative. As of August 6, 2025,
all provisions following the subsection's introductory portion
have been deleted or repealed. (See SB16-115, chapter 356,
page 1482, Session Laws of Colorado 2016, and SB25-275,
chapter 377, page 2109, Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
37-23-114 (6) 58 Deletes cross references to sections 37-23-115 to 37-23-118
due to the repeal of these sections, effective July 1, 2024. (See
section 37-23-115 to 37-23-118, C.R.S. 2023, and
HB24-1056, chapter 165, page 804, Session Laws of Colorado
2024.)
37-43-183 (2) 59 Deletes cross references to sections 37-43-184 to 37-43-189
due to the repeal of these sections, effective July 1, 2024. (See
section 37-43-184 to 37-43-189, C.R.S. 2023, and
HB24-1056, chapter 165, pages 806 to 808, Session Laws of
Colorado 2024.)
38-12-402 60 • [(2)(a.5)(I)(A)] Changes the format of an internal reference
(2)(a.5)(I)(A) and (3) to conform to standard drafting practices. (See section 5.6.2
of the Colorado Legislative Drafting Manual, Online Edition,
PAGE 43-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
Revised December 2025, the 2025 House Journal for March
15, page 543, and HB25-1168, chapter 229, page 1058,
Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
• [(3)] Corrects a grammatical error originating in the
introduced version of HB25-1168. (See HB25-1168, chapter
229, page 1058, Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
38-13-102 (13.5) 61 Corrects a typographical error originating in the introduced
version of HB25-1224 that resulted in an incorrect cross
reference to the definition of merchandise. (See HB25-1224,
chapter 440, page 2531, Session Laws of Colorado 2025.)
39-22-554 62 Alphabetizes the definitions in this section to conform to
(2)(g.5) and (2)(i.5) standard drafting practices. (See section 5.2.2 of the Colorado
Legislative Drafting Manual, Online Edition, Revised
December 2025, and SB24-214, chapter 191, page 1103,
Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
39-22-559 (2)(c) 63 Repeals a term that is not used in the section for which it is
defined. (See HB23-1309, chapter 379, page 2271, Session
Laws of Colorado 2023.)
39-22-5502 64 • [(4)(b)] Corrects a cross reference to the housing opportunity
(4)(b), (11), and (16) goal report. The error originated in house third reading floor
amendment No. 1, which amended the engrossed version of
HB24-1434. (See the 2024 House Journal for May 1, page
1790, the 2024 Red Book, footnote 155, Colorado General
Assembly website, HB24-1313, chapter 168, page 850, and
HB24-1434, chapter 291, page 1978, Session Laws of
Colorado 2024.)
•[(11)] Corrects a cross reference to the definition of
metropolitan planning organization. The error originated in
house third reading floor amendment No. 2, which amended
the engrossed version of HB24-1434. (See the 2024 House
Journal for May 1, page 1790, the 2024 Red Book, footnote
155, Colorado General Assembly website, HB24-1313,
chapter 168, page 850, and HB24-1434, chapter 291, page
1978, Session Laws of Colorado 2024.)
•[(16)] Repeals a term that is not used in the part for which it
is defined. (See HB24-1434, chapter 291, page 1978, Session
Laws of Colorado 2024.)
39-27-105 (1.3)(b) 65 Deletes text within this subsection as obsolete due to the
repeal of section 39-27-104 (2), effective December 31, 2022.
(See section 39-27-104 (2)(g), C.R.S. 2021, and HB21-1322,
chapter 453, page 3011, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.)
PAGE 44-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
39-29-108 IP(1) 66 Deletes text within this subsection as obsolete due to the
repeal of subsection (3), effective August 7, 2023. (See
HB23-1121, chapter 35, page 124, Session Laws of Colorado
2023.)
42-2-114 (12)(f) 67 Updates the names of house committees to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, HR23-1002, page 3575, Session
Laws of Colorado 2023, and HR24-1001, page 4487, Session
Laws of Colorado 2024.)
42-2-303 (6)(f) 68 Updates the names of house committees to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, HR23-1002, page 3575, Session
Laws of Colorado 2023, and HR24-1001, page 4487, Session
Laws of Colorado 2024.)
42-3-113 (9.5)(e) 69 Updates the names of house committees to conform with
house rule 25. (See the Legislative Rule Book, Updated
November 2025, page 11, HR23-1002, page 3575, Session
Laws of Colorado 2023, and HR24-1001, page 4487, Session
Laws of Colorado 2024.)
42-4-234 (2) 70 Changes "American Society of Agricultural Engineers" to
"American Society of Agricultural and Biological Engineers"
to correctly cite the name of the organization. (See the
American Society of Agricultural and Biological Engineers
website at https://asabe.org/about-us.)
43-4-205 71 Amends subsection (6.5) and repeals subsections (6.4) and
(6.4), (6.5), and (6.7) (6.7) due to the repeal of section 24-75-219 (5), effective June
17, 2021. (See SB21-260, chapter 250, page 1379, Session
Laws of Colorado 2021.)
43-4-207 72 Deletes text within subsections (1) and IP(2)(b) due to the
(1) and IP(2)(b) repeal of section 24-75-219 (5), effective June 17, 2021, and
section 43-4-205 (6.4), effective on the effective date of this
act. (See section 71 of this act and SB21-260, chapter 250,
page 1379, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.)
44-30-1517 73 Repeals this section as obsolete. This section requires the
secretary of state to submit a ballot issue, known as
Proposition JJ, to the registered electors for approval or
rejection in the November 2024 general election. (See
HB24-1436, chapter 212, page 1298, Session Laws of
Colorado 2024.)
PAGE 45-SENATE BILL 26-169

C.R.S. Section Reason for Amendment
Section in bill
29-35-503 (1) 74 Corrects a drafting error in House Bill 26-1001 by changing
(Added by HB26-1001) the date listed in this provision from "June 31, 2028" to "June
30, 2028" because June 31, 2028, is not a valid date on the
calendar. (See HB26-1001.)
42-2-124 (7)(c)(IV)(A) 75 Corrects an incorrect internal reference in HB26-1007
(Added by HB26-1007) originating in the senate transportation and energy committee
report. (See HB26-1007 and the 2026 Senate Journal for
March 26, page 499).
PAGE 46-SENATE BILL 26-169